Louisiana, session 2026, HB556.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1505.4(A)(1), (B), and (E) and 1511.4.1(B) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 18:1505.4(A)(4)(c) and (F) and 1511.4.1(E) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§1505.4. Civil penalties; failure to file; timely and accurate filing; forfeiture
A.(1) Any candidate, the treasurer or chairman of a committee, or any other
person required to file any reports under this Chapter, who knowingly fails to file or
who knowingly fails to timely file any such reports as are required by this Chapter
may be assessed a civil penalty as provided in R.S. 18:1511.4.1 for each day until
such report is filed, subject to the delays provided in Subsection E of this Section.
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-849 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 556
(4)
* * *
(c) For purposes of this Paragraph, a report shall be considered due on the
deadline contained in the notice of delinquency provided for in Subsection E of this
Section.
* * *
B. Any candidate, the treasurer or chairman of any committee, or any other
person required to file reports under this Chapter who knowingly and willfully fails
to disclose, or knowingly and willfully fails to accurately disclose, any information
required by this Chapter to be disclosed in the reports required by this Chapter, may
be assessed a civil penalty for each day until such information is disclosed by
amendment to the appropriate report of such candidate, committee, or other person
filed, subject to the delays provided in Subsection E of this Section. "Knowingly and
willfully", for purposes of this Subsection, means conduct which could have been
avoided through the exercise of due diligence. Such penalties shall be as provided
in Subsection A of this Section.
* * *
E.(1)(a) If a candidate, the treasurer or chairman of any committee, or any
other person required to file reports under this Chapter fails to timely file a report
required by this Chapter, or omits any information required to be included in the
report, or the supervisory committee has reason to believe information included in
the report is inaccurate, the supervisory committee shall notify the candidate, the
treasurer or chairman, or other person of such failure, omission, or inaccuracy by
sending him by certified mail or service of process a notice of delinquency
immediately upon discovery of the failure, omission, or inaccuracy.
(b) The notice of delinquency shall inform the candidate, the treasurer or
chairman, or other person that the report must be filed, or that the information must
be disclosed or accurately disclosed, or that a written answer contesting the
allegation of such a failure, omission, or inaccuracy must be filed no later than seven
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-849 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 556
business days after receipt of the notice of delinquency. The notice shall include the
deadline for filing the statement, filing the answer, or disclosing or accurately
disclosing the information.
(c) The supervisory committee shall inform the candidate, the treasurer or
chairman, or other person in the notice of delinquency that failure to file the report,
to disclose or accurately disclose the information, or to file an answer contesting the
allegation by the deadline may result in the imposition of penalties as provided in
Subsections A and B of this Section.
(2)(a) If the candidate, the treasurer or chairman, or other person files the
statement, provides the omitted information, or corrects the inaccurate information
prior to the deadline contained in the notice of delinquency, no penalties shall be
assessed against the candidate, the treasurer or chairman, or other person. If the
candidate, the treasurer or chairman, or other person files a written answer contesting
the allegations prior to the deadline contained in the notice of delinquency, no
penalties shall be assessed until a determination is made by the supervisory
committee that a violation occurred.
(b) If the candidate, the treasurer or chairman, or other person fails to file the
statement, fails to provide the omitted information, fails to correct the inaccurate
information, or fails to file a written answer prior to the deadline contained in the
notice of delinquency, he may be subject to assessment of the penalties provided in
Subsections A and B of this Section for each day until the statement, omitted
information, corrected information, or written answer is filed.
(c) Upon a finding by the supervisory committee in connection with a
written answer that no violation has occurred, no penalties shall be assessed against
the candidate, the treasurer or chairman, or other person. If the supervisory
committee finds in connection with a written answer that the candidate, the treasurer
or chairman, or other person has failed to file the statement or failed to disclose or
accurately disclose the required information, he shall be subject to assessment of the
penalties provided in Subsections A and B of this Section for each day until the
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-849 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 556
statement is filed, until the omitted information is filed, or until the inaccurate
information is corrected.
E. F. The computation of days provided for in Subsections A, and B, and E
of this Section shall not include Saturdays, Sundays, or other legal holidays.
* * *
§1511.4.1. Enforcement; failure to file; failure to timely file
* * *
B. The supervisory committee may waive all or part of any civil penalties
assessed pursuant to Subsection A of this Section. Any waiver granted by the
supervisory committee shall be permanent in effect, and the board shall not grant
conditional waivers, such as a waiver pending future compliance with any law under
its jurisdiction. A request for waiver of such penalties shall be made in writing to the
supervisory committee, which shall promulgate rules governing the procedure to
request a waiver. The supervisory committee may take into consideration the
provisions of R.S. 18:1511.5(B) in its consideration of the request for waiver of civil
penalties. The final disposition of a waiver request shall not be appealable to the
Ethics Adjudicatory Board or a panel thereof.
* * *
E. The staff of the supervisory committee shall mail by certified mail a
notice of delinquency within four days after the due date of which the staff knows
or has reason to know, for any report or statement due under the laws within its
jurisdiction which has not been timely filed.
Section 2. R.S. 42:1157(A)(1)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1157. Late filing fees
A.(1)
* * *
(b) The Board of Ethics may waive all or any part of late filing fees assessed
pursuant to Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph. Any waiver granted by the board
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-849 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 556
shall be permanent in effect, and the board shall not grant conditional waivers, such
as a waiver pending future compliance with any law under its jurisdiction. Any
request for waiver of late filing fees assessed in a final order of the staff of the Board
of Ethics shall be made to the Board of Ethics, which shall promulgate rules
governing the procedure to request a waiver as well as to provide for waiver for
"good cause" shown. "Good cause" shall be defined as any action or circumstance
which, in the considered judgment of the Board of Ethics, were not within the control
of the late filer and which were the direct cause of the late filing or any applicable
provision in R.S. 18:1511.5(B). The final disposition of the Board of Ethics on a
request for waiver shall not be appealable to the Ethics Adjudicatory Board.
* * *